test/src/gt-norm-yamls/V-moistw_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:



# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct.


  Verb - mȯistõ: # Verb 23 'eng /est mõista/fin' - full paradigm
     mȯistõ+V+Inf: mȯistõ
     mȯistõ+V+Ger: mȯistõs
     mȯistõ+V+Sup: mūoštam
     mȯistõ+V+Sup+Ine: mūoštamõs
     mȯistõ+V+Sup+Ela: mūoštamõst
     mȯistõ+V+Sup+Tra: mūoštamõks
     mȯistõ+V+Sup+Abe: mūoštamõt
     mȯistõ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: mūoštab
     mȯistõ+V+Ind+Prs+Pl2: mūoštat
     mȯistõ+V+Ind+Prs+Pl3: mūoštabõd
     mȯistõ+V+Ind+Prt+Sg3: mūoštiz
     mȯistõ+V+Ind+Prt+Pl2: [mūoštizt, mūoštiztõ]
     mȯistõ+V+Ind+Prt+Pl3: [mūoštizt, mūoštiztõ]
     mȯistõ+V+Ind+ConNeg+Sg: mȯist
     mȯistõ+V+Cond+Sg3: mūoštaks
     mȯistõ+V+Imprt+Sg2: mūošta
     mȯistõ+V+Imprt+ConNeg+Sg2: mȯistõ
     mȯistõ+V+Imprt+Pl2: mūoštagid
     mȯistõ+V+Jus+Sg3: mūoštag
     mȯistõ+V+QuoSg3: mūoštaji
     mȯistõ+V+ActPrfPrc: mȯistõn
     mȯistõ+V+PssPrfPrc: mȯistõd
